fi: Kehon puoli: Molemminpuolinen; Vasen; Oikea; Muu
da: Kropsside: Bilateral; Venstre; Højre; Andet
pt-PT: Lado do corpo: Bilateral; Esquerda; Direita; Outro
sv: Kroppssida: Bilateral; Vänster; Höger; Övrigt
en: Body side: Bilateral; Left; Right; Other
ro-RO: Partea corpului: Bilateral; Stânga; Dreapta; Altele
fr: Côté du corps: Bilatéral; Gauche; Droite; Autre
nl: Lichaamszijde: Bilateraal; Links; Rechts; Andere
el: Πλευρά σώματος: Αμφοτερόπλευρο; Αριστερά; Δικαίωμα; Άλλο
ja: 装着側: 両側; 左; 右; その他
th: ด้านของร่างกาย: ทั้งสองข้าง; ด้านซ้าย; ด้านขวา; อื่นๆ
ko: 신체 측면: 양측; 왼쪽; 오른쪽; 기타
lt-LT: Kūno pusė: Abipusis; Kairė; Dešinė; Kita
sl-SI: Stran telesa: Obojestransko; Leva; Desna; Drugo
es: Lado del cuerpo: Bilateral; Izquierda; Derecha; Otros
vi: Bên cơ thể: Hai bên; Trái; Phải; Khác
cs: Strana těla: Oboustranný; Levá strana; Pravá strana; Jiné
tr: Vücut tarafı: Çift taraflı; Sol; Sağ; Diğer
sk-SK: Strana tela: Obojstranná; Vľavo; Vpravo; Iné
hr-HR: Strana tijela: Obostrano; Lijeva; Desna; Ostalo
it: Lato del corpo: Bilaterale; A sinistra; A destra; Altro
pl: Strona ciała: Obustronna; Lewy; Prawy; Inne
hu: Test oldala: Kétoldali; Bal oldal; Jobb oldal; Egyéb
ru: Сторона тела: Двусторонний; Слева; Справа; Другой
nb: Kroppsside: Bilateral; Venstre; Høyre; Annet
de: Körperseite: Beidseitig; Links; Rechts; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 适配身体侧: 双侧; 左; 右; 其他
pt-BR: Lado do corpo: Bilateral; Esquerda; Direita; Outro
bg-BG: Страна на тялото: Двустранно; Вляво; Вдясно; Други
zh-TW: 身體側別: 雙側; 左; 右; 其他